Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 461.21, is amended to read: 461.21 KIOSK SALES PROHIBITEDnew text begin ; EXCEPTIONnew text end . new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end no person shall sell tobacco, tobacco-related devices, or electronic delivery devices as defined in section 609.685, subdivision 1, or nicotine or lobelia delivery products as described in section 609.6855, from a movable place of business. For the purposes of this section, a movable place of business means any retail business whose physical location is not permanent, including, but not limited to, any retail business that is operated from a kiosk, other transportable structure, or a motorized or nonmotorized vehicle. new text begin (b) A person with a distributor license issued under chapter 297F for at least five consecutive years may sell premium cigars from a movable place of business and provide on-site demonstrations of premium cigar manufacturing and cultural education from the movable place of business. A person authorized to sell and demonstrate under this paragraph: (1) is not required to obtain a separate license under chapter 297F for the movable place of business; (2) must pay all applicable taxes related to the movable place of business; and (3) must not sell any tobacco products other than premium cigars. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end